Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 General Provisions

45-13-1.
Election.

There shall be a Secretary of State who shall be elected at the same time and in the same manner as the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1872, p. 80, § 6; Code 1873, § 80; Code 1882, § 80; Civil Code 1895, § 176; Civil Code 1910, § 205; Code 1933, § 40-501.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Organization of the Office of Secretary of State, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Office of Secretary of State, Chapter 590-1.

45-13-2.
Bond.

Before entering on the duties of his office, the Secretary of State shall execute a bond with sufficient securities, to be approved by the Governor, in the sum of $10,000.00, conditioned for the faithful performance of all the duties of his office and all such duties as shall be required of him by the General Assembly or the laws of this state and for a faithful accounting of all the public money or effects that may come into his hands during his continuance in office. It shall be filed in the office of the Governor; and a copy thereof, certified by one of the Governor’s secretaries under the seal of the office of the Governor, shall be received in evidence in lieu of the original in any of the courts of this state.

History.

Laws 1843, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1034; Code 1863, § 82; Code 1868, § 76; Code 1873, § 81; Code 1882, § 81; Civil Code 1895, § 177; Civil Code 1910, § 206; Code 1933, § 40-502.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, T. 45, C. 4.

45-13-3.
Office; residence.

The Secretary of State shall be provided with suitable offices in the state capital, furnished at the state’s expense. He shall reside at the capital and shall keep his office open daily except on Sundays and holidays.

History.

Ga. L. 1861, p. 72, § 3; Code 1863, § 83; Code 1868, § 77; Code 1873, § 82; Code 1882, § 82; Civil Code 1895, § 178; Civil Code 1910, § 207; Code 1933, § 40-503.

45-13-4.
Compensation.

The Secretary of State shall be compensated in the amount and manner provided in Code Sections 45-7-3 and 45-7-4. He shall also receive actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier, the legal mileage rate for use of a personal automobile, and the actual cost of lodging and meals while away from his office on official state business, as provided in Code Section 45-7-20.

History.

Laws 1826, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1027; Code 1863, §§ 85, 1572; Code 1868, §§ 79, 1634; Code 1873, §§ 84, 1640; Code 1882, §§ 84, 1640; Civil Code 1895, §§ 180, 282; Civil Code 1910, §§ 209, 317; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 86; Code 1933, § 40-504; Ga. L. 1937, p. 208, § 1; Ga. L. 1941, p. 288, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 356, § 2; Ga. L. 1947, p. 673, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 66, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 96, § 1.

Cross references.

Mileage allowance, §

50-19-7

.

45-13-5.
Speculation on purchase or sale of wild lands.

The Secretary of State shall not, directly or indirectly, be interested or engaged in the purchase and sale of wild lands on speculation or he will be subject to removal by the Governor or the General Assembly.

History.

Code 1933, § 40-602.

Cross references.

Conflicts of interest of state officials and employees generally, §

45-10-20

et seq.